sv: Integration av skyddsglasögon: Designad för glasögon; Inkluderar glasögon i förpackningen; Inkluderar kanal för glasögonband; Inkluderar fäste för glasögonband; Ej glasögonkompatibel/ej avsedd; Annan
es: Integración de gafas: Diseñado para gafas; Incluye gafas en la caja; Incluye canal para correa de gafas; Incluye agarre para correa de gafas; No compatible con gafas / no previsto; Otro
ro-RO: Integrarea cu ochelarii de protecție: Conceput pentru ochelari de protecție; Include ochelarii de protecție în cutie; Include canal pentru cureaua ochelarilor; Include prindere pentru cureaua ochelarilor; Incompatibil cu ochelari/Nerecomandat; Altele
ko: 구글 일체형: 고글용으로 디자인됨; 박스 내 고글 포함; 고글 스트랩 채널 포함; 고글 스트랩 그리퍼 포함; 고글 호환 불가/비권장; 기타
pt-BR: Integração dos óculos de proteção: Projetado para óculos de proteção; Inclui óculos na caixa; Inclui canal para tira de óculos; Inclui prendedor para tira de óculos; Incompatível com óculos/Não projetado para isso; Outro
fi: Suojalasien saumaton istuvuus: Suunniteltu suojalaseille; Sisältää suojalasit paketissa; Sisältää suojalasien hihnan uran; Sisältää suojalasien hihnan pitimen; Ei yhteensopiva suojalasien kanssa / ei tarkoitettu; Muu
sl-SI: Integracija z očali: Zasnovano za očala; Vključuje očala; Vključuje kanal za trak očal; Vključuje držalo za trak očal; Ni združljivo z očali/Ni namenjeno za očala; Drugo
nb: Goggle-integrasjon: Designet for beskyttelsesbriller; Inkluderer briller i esken; Inkluderer kanal for brillestropp; Inkluderer feste for brillestropp; Ikke brillekompatibel / ikke beregnet; Annet
fr: Intégration avec les lunettes de protection: Conçu pour les lunettes de protection; Comprend des lunettes de protection dans la boîte; Comprend un canal pour sangle de lunettes de protection; Comprend une pince pour sangle de lunettes de protection; Non compatible avec des lunettes de protection/non prévu; Autre
sk-SK: Integrácia s Googlom: Navrhnuté pre okuliare; Okuliare sú súčasťou balenia; Obsahuje kanálik na remienok okuliarov; Obsahuje úchyt na remienok okuliarov; Nekompatibilné s okuliarmi/neurčené na okuliare; Iné
ru: Интеграция очков: Разработано для очков; Очки в комплекте; Канал для ремешка очков; Фиксатор ремешка очков; Несовместимо с очками/Не предназначено; Другое
vi: Khả năng tích hợp kính bảo hộ: Thiết kế cho kính bảo hộ; Bao gồm kính bảo hộ trong hộp; Bao gồm rãnh dây đeo kính bảo hộ; Bao gồm phần giữ dây đeo kính bảo hộ; Không tương thích với kính bảo hộ/Không dành cho kính bảo hộ; Khác
tr: Goggle uyumluluğu: Gözlükler için tasarlandı; Kutuya gözlük dahildir; Gözlük kayışı kanalı içerir; Gözlük kayışı tutucu içerir; Gözlük uyumlu değil/Uygun değil; Diğer
hu: Védőszemüveg integráció: Szemüveghez tervezve; Szemüveget tartalmaz a dobozban; Szemüvegpánt-vezetővel; Szemüvegpánt-rögzítővel; Nem kompatibilis szemüveggel / Nem arra szánták; Egyéb
ja: ゴーグルとの連携: ゴーグル専用設計; ゴーグル同梱; ゴーグルストラップチャネル付き; ゴーグルストラップグリッパー付き; ゴーグル非対応/非推奨; その他
da: Integration af beskyttelsesbriller: Designet til goggles; Inkluderer goggles i æsken; Inkluderer kanal til goggle-strop; Inkluderer gribestykke til goggle-strop; Ikke kompatibel med goggles/Ikke beregnet; Anden
de: Schutzbrillenintegration: Für Schutzbrillen entwickelt; Inklusive Schutzbrille; Mit Schutzbrillenbandkanal; Mit Schutzbrillenband-Halterung; Nicht für Schutzbrillen geeignet; Andere
it: Integrazione con la maschera: Progettato per maschere; Include maschera nella confezione; Include canale per fascia della maschera; Include blocco per fascia della maschera; Non compatibile con maschera/non previsto; Altro
el: Ενσωμάτωση στα προστατευτικά γυαλιά: Σχεδιασμένο για μάσκα; Περιλαμβάνει μάσκα στη συσκευασία; Περιλαμβάνει κανάλι για λουράκι μάσκας; Περιλαμβάνει σύστημα συγκράτησης για λουράκι μάσκας; Μη συμβατό με μάσκα/Δεν προορίζεται για μάσκα; Άλλο
th: การผสานรวมของแว่นตา: ออกแบบมาสำหรับแว่นตากันลม; รวมแว่นตากันลมในกล่อง; มีช่องสำหรับสายรัดแว่นตากันลม; มีแถบยึดสายรัดแว่นตากันลม; ไม่รองรับแว่นตากันลม/ไม่ได้ออกแบบมาเพื่อการนี้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 护目镜集成: 专为护目镜设计; 包装内含护目镜; 包含护目镜带槽; 包含护目镜带防滑条; 不兼容护目镜/不适用; 其他
cs: Integrace Goggle: Navrženo pro brýle; Obsahuje brýle v balení; Obsahuje kanálek na pásek brýlí; Obsahuje úchyt pásku brýlí; Není kompatibilní s brýlemi / Není určeno; Ostatní
pt-PT: Integração com o Google: Concebido para óculos de proteção; Inclui óculos de proteção na caixa; Inclui canal para fita de óculos; Inclui aderência para fita de óculos; Não compatível com óculos de proteção/não previsto; Outro
lt-LT: Akinių integracija: Skirta akiniams; Pakuotėje yra akiniai; Yra kanalas akinių dirželiui; Yra akinių dirželio laikiklis; Nesuderinama su akiniais / neskirta akiniams; Kita
hr-HR: Integracija s Googleom: Dizajnirano za zaštitne naočale; Uključuje zaštitne naočale u pakiranju; Uključuje kanal za remen zaštitnih naočala; Uključuje dio za pričvršćivanje remena naočala; Nije kompatibilno s naočalama / nije predviđeno; Ostalo
zh-TW: 護目鏡整合設計: 為護目鏡設計; 包裝內含護目鏡; 包含護目鏡帶溝槽; 包含護目鏡帶防滑條; 不相容於護目鏡/非為其設計; 其他
bg-BG: Интеграция на предпазните очила: Проектиран за предпазни очила; Включени предпазни очила в кутията; Включва канал за каишка на предпазни очила; Включва държач за каишка на предпазни очила; Не е съвместим/не е предназначен за предпазни очила; Друго
nl: Bril integratie: Ontworpen voor brillen; Bril inbegrepen in doos; Inclusief brilbandkanaal; Inclusief brilbandhouder; Niet brilcompatibel/niet bedoeld; Anders
pl: Integracja gogli: Zaprojektowany dla gogli; Gogle w zestawie; Zawiera kanał na pasek gogli; Zawiera uchwyt na pasek gogli; Niekompatybilne z goglami / Nieprzeznaczone; Inne
en: Goggle integration: Designed for goggles; Includes goggle in box; Includes goggle strap channel; Includes goggle strap gripper; Not goggle-compatible/Not intended; Other